Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
PART 3 Installation of Manufactured Homes and Mobile Homes

8-2-160.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Commissioner” means the Safety Fire Commissioner.

“Installation” means the construction of a foundation system and the placement or erection of a manufactured home or a mobile home on the foundation system. Such term includes, without limitation, supporting, blocking, leveling, securing, or anchoring such home and connecting multiple or expandable sections of such home.

“Installer” means a person responsible for performing an installation and who is required to obtain a license pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 8-2-164.

“Manufactured home” means a new or used structure, transportable in one or more sections, which, in the traveling mode, is eight body feet or more in width or 40 body feet or more in length or, when erected on site, is 320 or more square feet and which is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and electrical systems contained therein; except that such term shall include any structure which meets all the requirements of this paragraph except the size requirements and with respect to which the manufacturer voluntarily files a certification required by the secretary of housing and urban development and complies with the standards established under the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq.

“Manufacturer” means any person who constructs or assembles manufactured housing.

“Mobile home” means a new or used structure, transportable in one or more sections, which, in the traveling mode, is eight body feet or more in width or 40 body feet or more in length or, when erected on site, is 320 or more square feet and which is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and electrical systems contained therein and built prior to June 15, 1976.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, association, or any other legal entity, but shall not include a trust or the state or any political subdivision thereof.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-160

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2750, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 8/HB 90.

8-2-160.1.
Cooperative agreements.

The Commissioner is authorized and empowered to contract or enter into cooperative agreements with any agency, department, or instrumentality of the United States as may be necessary to participate in the enforcement of manufactured home installation standards which may be promulgated pursuant to the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq.; provided, however, that the Commissioner shall notify the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development by July 1 of his or her intention to terminate any such contract or agreement, which termination shall become effective on July 1 of the following year.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-160.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, a comma was inserted between “agreement” and “which”.

8-2-161.
Duty of Commissioner to establish rules and procedures for licensure and installation.

During such time as the Commissioner has contracted or entered into cooperative agreements pursuant to his or her authority under Code Section 8-2-160.1, the Commissioner may:

Establish rules and procedures for the licensure of installers as provided by Code Section 8-2-164 and the implementation and collection of an annual license fee, which shall be $300.00; and

Establish and publish in print or electronically rules and regulations governing the installation of manufactured homes and mobile homes to be followed in instances in which no manufacturer’s installation instructions are available. Such rules and regulations shall be equivalent to usual and ordinary manufacturer’s installation instructions.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-161

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2750, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-21/HB 1055; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

8-2-162.
Administration of part by Commissioner; investigation of consumer complaints.

During such time as the Commissioner has contracted or entered into cooperative agreements pursuant to his or her authority under Code Section 8-2-160.1, the Commissioner has full authority to administer this part and may make, amend, alter, and repeal general rules and regulations of procedure to carry into effect this part, to obtain statistical data concerning manufactured homes and mobile homes, and to prescribe means, methods, and practices to make this part effective. The Commissioner may also make such investigations of consumer complaints relating to installations as in his or her judgment are necessary to enforce and administer this part.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-162

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2750, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 2.

8-2-163.
Prohibited act.

It shall be unlawful for any person to perform an installation of a manufactured home or a mobile home, without regard to whether such person receives compensation for such action, except as provided in this part.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-163

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2750, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 2.

8-2-164.
License required; permit purchase.

During such time as the Commissioner has contracted or entered into cooperative agreements pursuant to his or her authority under Code Section 8-2-160.1:

Any installer performing any installation of a manufactured home or a mobile home in this state shall first obtain a license from the Commissioner; provided, however, that persons employed by or contracting with a licensed installer to perform installations shall not be required to obtain such license; and

In addition to the requirements of paragraph (1) of this Code section, any installer performing any installation of any new or pre-owned manufactured or mobile home in this state shall first purchase a permit from the Commissioner. The cost of such permit shall be $60.00 for each manufactured or mobile home. Each installer shall provide any information required by the Commissioner to be submitted to obtain a permit. A permit shall be attached by the installer to the panel box of each manufactured or mobile home upon completion of installation.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-164

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2750, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-22/HB 1055.

8-2-165.
Compliance with manufacturer’s installation instructions; random inspections on installations.

Any installation of a manufactured home or a mobile home in this state shall be performed in strict compliance with the applicable manufacturer’s installation instructions, specifically including, without limitation, correctly installed tie-downs and anchors. In the absence of such instructions, installations shall be performed in accordance with the applicable rules and regulations adopted by the Commissioner.

During such time as the Commissioner has contracted or entered into cooperative agreements pursuant to his or her authority under Code Section 8-2-160.1, the Commissioner or his or her agent shall perform random inspections on installations performed by each installer each year. The inspections required by this subsection shall be independent of any requirements under Subpart I of Part 3282 of the Manufactured Home Procedural and Enforcement Regulations of the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-165

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2750, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 2.

8-2-166.
Penalty for violation.

Any person determined by the Commissioner to be in violation of this part may be penalized by a fine of not more than $500.00 for each such violation, and by the suspension or revocation of licensure. Multiple violations of this part occurring in a single installation shall constitute one violation. Each installation performed in violation of this part shall constitute a separate violation. In addition to any penalty imposed by the Commissioner, any person convicted of a violation of this part shall be guilty of and may be punished as for a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-166

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2750, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 2.

8-2-167.
Political subdivisions prohibited from adopting or enforcing requirements not consistent with part.

No political subdivision may adopt or enforce any requirement not consistent with this part.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-167

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2750, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 2.

8-2-168.
Compliance with “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

The adoption of rules and conduct of hearings under this part shall be in compliance with the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

The Commissioner is authorized to provide by regulation the manner in which he or she will conduct presentations of views during his or her participation as the state administrative agency as required by the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-168

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2750, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 2.